Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.906

Application of chapter to foreign degree-granting institution branch campuses.

This chapter shall not apply to any approved branch campus of a foreign degree-granting institution in compliance with chapter 28B.90 RCW.

[ 1993 c 181 s 7.]